Tennessee, session 114, SB0596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-7-201, is amended by deleting
subsection (f) and substituting instead:
(f) The limitation as to length stated in this section does not apply to loads of
poles, logs, or timber in single-length pieces; provided, that:
(1) The motor vehicle, including any part of the body or load, transporting
such material must not exceed seventy-five feet (75') in length unless a permit
has first been obtained as authorized in § 55-7-205; and
(2) The load of poles, logs, or timber:
(A) Is hauled by a trailer with an extendable and retractable rear
impact protection that:
(i) Meets or exceeds the standards set forth by the
national highway traffic safety administration (NHTSA) in 49 CFR
571.223; and
(ii) Extends beyond the longest log, pole, or piece of
timber on the trailer; or
(B) Is followed by an escort vehicle with a sign attached to the
rear of the vehicle that:
(i) Is at least seven feet (7′) wide and eighteen inches
(18″) high; and
SB0596
002667
- 1 -

(ii) Contains the words "OVERSIZE LOAD" in black letters
that are at least ten inches (10″) high on a yellow background.
SECTION 2. If the department of safety or department of transportation receives
documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act may
jeopardize federal funding or grant money for the respective department, then that department
is not required to comply with such provision; provided, that the departments shall comply with
each provision of this act that does not jeopardize such federal funding or grant money.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002667